Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-101, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 182, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 3-101), is amended to read as follows:
Section 3-101. A. The State Board of Education shall consist
of seven (7) nine (9) members. The State Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall be a member and the chairperson of the Board. The
remaining six members shall be appointed by the Governor by and with
the advice and consent of the Senate. Except as otherwise provided
for in subsection B of this section, upon assuming office each
Governor shall appoint one member from each congressional district
and one member from the state at large Four members shall be
appointed by the Governor, two members shall be appointed by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives, and two members shall be
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3327 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

appo inted by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. Each
appointment shall be made to take effect on April 2. The term of
each appointed member shall be four (4) years. Appointed members
shall serve until a successor is appointed. Appointed members shall
serve at the pleasure of the Governor only be removed for cause by
their appointing authority. Upon the occurrence of a vacancy the
same shall be filled by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the
Senate at the next session of the Legislature in the same manner as
the original appointment. The appointment to fill a vacancy shall
be made for the unexpired term.
B. On the effective date of this act, all appointed positions
of the current State Board of Education shall be deemed vacant and
the terms of persons serving on the Board shall be deemed
terminated. The Governor, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, and the President Pro Tempore shall each make their
initial appointments pursuant to the provisions of this subsection
within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this act, with one
member appointed from each congressional district and one member
appointed from the state at large. The appointments shall be
subject to confirmation by the Senate at the next session of the
Legislature. The terms for members appointed pursuant to this
subsection shall terminate on April 2, 2015 2030. Thereafter,
members shall be appointed as provided for in subsection A of this
section.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3327 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. No person shall be eligible to be appointed to serve on the
Board unless the person has been awarded a high school diploma or
certificate of high school equivalency. No person shall be
appointed to serve on the Board if the person serves on a board of
education of a school district which is supervised by the Board
pursuant to Section 3-104 of this title. Any member appointed to
the Board shall complete the workshop requirements of a new school
board member pursuant to Section 5-110 of this title within thirteen
(13) months following or preceding the appointment of the member.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State
Department of Education shall not charge any member of the State
Board of Education a fee for any workshop provided by the Department
for board members pursuant to Section 5-110 of this title and shall
not pay a fee to any organization or institution of higher education
on behalf of a member of the State Board of Education, or reimburse
any member of the Board for a fee paid to any organization or
institution of higher education, for attendance at a workshop or
courses to satisfy the requirements of Section 5-110 of this title.
D. Members of the Board shall receive necessary traveling
expenses while in the performance of their duties in accordance with
the State Travel Reimbursement Act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3327 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RULES
April 23, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED





















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3327 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)